Nebraska, session 109, LB625.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB625 LB625
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) The Department of Revenue shall develop, maintain,
and make available for public inspection on its website a database of
financial information from all school districts in the state. The
information required shall include, but not be limited to, revenue
sources, expenditures, and a balance sheet that contains all assets and
liabilities, which reflects all committed and uncommitted funds. The Tax
Commissioner shall designate an implementation date for such database
which date is on or before January 1, 2026.
(2) School districts shall provide to the department such
information as is necessary to develop and maintain the database. School
districts shall provide updated information to the department on an
annual basis, and the department shall update the database no later than
thirty days after receiving any such information.
(3) Nothing in this section requires the disclosure of information
which is considered confidential under state or federal law or is not a
public record under section 84-712.05.
-2-